Vermont, session 2025-2026, H273.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 32 V.S.A. § 3752(7) is amended to read:
(7)(A) “Farmer” means a person:
(A)(i) who earns at least one-half 25 percent of the farmer’s
annual gross income from the business of farming as that term is defined in
Regulation 1.175-3 issued under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986; or
(B)(i) (ii)(I) who produces farm crops that are processed in a farm
facility situated on land enrolled by the farmer in a use value appraisal program
or on a housesite adjoining the enrolled land;
(ii)(II) whose gross income from the sale of the processed farm
products pursuant to subdivision (i)(I) of this subdivision (B)(7)(A)(ii), when
added to other gross income from the business of farming as used in
subdivision (A)(i) of this subdivision (7)(A), equals at least one-half 25 percent
of the farmer’s annual gross income; and
(iii)(III) who produces on the farm a minimum of 75 percent of
the farm crops processed in the farm facility; or
VT LEG #380501 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.273
2025 Page 3 of 4
(iii) who earns at least 25 percent of the farmer’s income from the
raising, feeding, or management of equines.
(C)(B) The Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets shall assist the
Director in making determinations of eligibility pursuant to subdivision
(B)(A)(ii) of this subdivision (7).
Sec. 2. 32 V.S.A. § 3757(a) is amended to read:
(a) Land that has been classified as agricultural land or managed forestland
pursuant to this chapter shall be subject to a land use change tax upon the
development of that land, as defined in section 3752 of this chapter. The tax
shall be at the rate of 10 six percent of the full fair market value of the changed
land determined without regard to the use value appraisal. If changed land is a
portion of a parcel, the fair market value of the changed land shall be the fair
market value of the changed land as a separate parcel, divided by the common
level of appraisal. Such fair market value shall be determined as of the date
the land is no longer eligible for use value appraisal. This tax shall be in
addition to the annual property tax imposed upon such property. Nothing in
this section shall be construed to require payment of an additional land use
change tax upon the subsequent development of the same land, nor shall it be
construed to require payment of a land use change tax merely because
previously eligible land becomes ineligible, provided no development of the
land has occurred.
VT LEG #380501 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.273
2025 Page 4 of 4
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #380501 v.1